Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.100

Discrimination by participants prohibited—Violation.

In providing health care services the participant shall not discriminate against a person on the basis of the person's ability to pay for such services or because payment for the health care services provided to such persons will be made under the insurance program established under part A or B of Title XVIII of the federal social security act or under a state plan for medical assistance including Title XIX of the federal social security act or under the state medical assistance program authorized by chapter 74.09 RCW and agrees to accept assignment under section 18.42(b)(3)(B)(ii) of the federal social security act for all services for which payment may be made under part B of Title XVIII of the federal social security act and enters into an appropriate agreement with the department of social and health services for medical assistance under Title XIX of the federal social security act to provide services to individuals entitled to medical assistance under the plan and enters into appropriate agreements with the department of social and health services for medical care services under chapter 74.09 RCW. Participants found by the office or the department in violation of this section shall be declared ineligible for receiving assistance under the programs authorized by this chapter.

[ 2019 c 302 s 9; 1991 c 332 s 23.]